District of Columbia statutes.
38-1806.07

Jobs for D.C. Graduates Program.

(a)

In general. —

The nonprofit corporation shall establish a program, to be known as the “Jobs for D.C. Graduates Program”, to assist District of Columbia public schools and public charter schools in organizing and implementing a school-to-work transition system, which system shall give priority to providing assistance to at-risk youths and disadvantaged youths.

(b)

Conduct of program. —

In carrying out the program established under subsection (a), the nonprofit corporation, consistent with the policies of the nationally recognized Jobs for America’s Graduates, Inc., shall:

(1)

Establish performance standards for such program;

(2)

Provide ongoing enhancement and improvements in such program;

(3)

Provide research and reports on the results of such program; and

(4)

Provide preservice and inservice training.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [269], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2607

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1806.02 and § 38-1806.08.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.67.